hunspell/nb_NO.aff
SFX F Y 36
SFX F   0     rs          e
SFX F   é     eers        é
SFX F   0     ers         [^eélmr]
SFX F   0     ers         [^e][lr]
SFX F   el    lers        [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX F   0     ers         jel
SFX F   del   lers        ddel
SFX F   0     ers         [^d]del
SFX F   fel   lers        ffel
SFX F   kel   lers        kkel
SFX F   el    lers        [^k]kel
SFX F   mel   lers        mmel
SFX F   0     ers         [^m]mel
SFX F   0     ers         nel
SFX F   pel   lers        ppel
SFX F   el    lers        [^p]pel
SFX F   sel   lers        ssel
SFX F   el    lers        [^s]sel
SFX F   tel   lers        ttel
SFX F   el    lers        [^t]tel
SFX F   er    res         [^fmk]er
SFX F   fer   res         fer
SFX F   mer   res         mer
SFX F   ker   res         ker
SFX F   0     ers         [^aeouø]m
SFX F   0     mers        dlem
SFX F   0     ers         blem
SFX F   0     ers         [^lr]em
SFX F   0     mers        [^kbd][lr]em
SFX F   0     ers         krem
SFX F   0     mers        [aø]m
SFX F   0     mers        [bdgl]om
SFX F   0     ers         [^bdgl]om
SFX F   0     ers         [^eiks]um
SFX F   0     mers        [ks]um
SFX F   um    ers         [ei]um

SFX G Y 36
SFX G   0     ne          e
SFX G   é     eene        é
SFX G   0     ene         [^eélmr]
SFX G   0     ene         [^e][lr]
SFX G   el    lene        [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX G   0     ene         jel
SFX G   del   lene        ddel
SFX G   0     ene         [^d]del
SFX G   fel   lene        ffel
SFX G   kel   lene        kkel
SFX G   el    lene        [^k]kel
SFX G   mel   lene        mmel
SFX G   0     ene         [^m]mel
SFX G   0     ene         nel
SFX G   pel   lene        ppel
SFX G   el    lene        [^p]pel
SFX G   sel   lene        ssel
SFX G   el    lene        [^s]sel
SFX G   tel   lene        ttel
SFX G   el    lene        [^t]tel
SFX G   er    rene        [^fm]er
SFX G   fer   rene        fer
SFX G   mer   rene        mer
SFX G   0     ene         [^aeouø]m
SFX G   0     mene        [aø]m
SFX G   0     mene        jem
SFX G   0     mene        dlem
SFX G   0     ene         blem
SFX G   0     mene        [^kbd][lr]em
SFX G   0     ene         krem
SFX G   0     ene         [^jlr]em
SFX G   0     mene        [bdglr]om
SFX G   0     ene         [^bdglr]om
SFX G   0     ene         [^eiks]um
SFX G   0     mene        [ks]um
SFX G   um    ene         [ei]um

SFX H Y 36
SFX H   0     nes         e
SFX H   é     eenes       é
SFX H   0     enes        [^eélmr]
SFX H   0     enes        [^e][lr]
SFX H   el    lenes       [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX H   0     enes        jel
SFX H   del   lenes       ddel
SFX H   0     enes        [^d]del
SFX H   fel   lenes       ffel
SFX H   kel   lenes       kkel
SFX H   el    lenes       [^k]kel
SFX H   mel   lenes       mmel
SFX H   0     enes        [^m]mel
SFX H   0     enes        nel
SFX H   pel   lenes       ppel
SFX H   el    lenes       [^p]pel
SFX H   sel   lenes       ssel
SFX H   el    lenes       [^s]sel
SFX H   tel   lenes       ttel
SFX H   el    lenes       [^t]tel
SFX H   er    renes       [^fm]er
SFX H   fer   renes       fer
SFX H   mer   renes       mer
SFX H   0     enes        [^aeouø]m
SFX H   0     menes       [aø]m
SFX H   0     menes       jem
SFX H   0     menes       dlem
SFX H   0     enes        blem
SFX H   0     menes       [^kbd][lr]em
SFX H   0     enes        krem
SFX H   0     enes        [^jlr]em
SFX H   0     menes       [bdglr]om
SFX H   0     enes        [^bdglr]om
SFX H   0     enes        [^eiks]um
SFX H   0     menes       [ks]um
SFX H   um    enes        [ei]um

SFX I Y 16
SFX I   0     e           er
SFX I   0     es          er
SFX I   0     ne          er
SFX I   0     nes         er
SFX I   0     ne          [æø]r
SFX I   0     nes         [æø]r
SFX I   en    nene        en
SFX I   en    nenes       en
SFX I   e     ne          ye
SFX I   e     nene        ye
SFX I   ive   ev          ive
SFX I   ive   evet        ive
SFX I   ike   ek          ike
SFX I   ike   eket        ike
SFX I   0     et          um
SFX I   0     ets         um

SFX J Y 1
SFX J   0     s           [^s]

SFX K Y 5
SFX K   0     es          [^er]
SFX K   e     ær          e
SFX K   e     ærne        e
SFX K   er    sk          er
SFX K   er    ske         er

SFX L Y 7
SFX L   0     r           [aiouyøå]
SFX L   0     er          er
SFX L   0     ers         er
SFX L   0     ene         er
SFX L   0     enes        er
SFX L   0     et          e
SFX L   0     ets         e

SFX M Y 30
SFX M   0     t           e
SFX M   0     de          e
SFX M   t     de          et
SFX M   ok    øker        ok
SFX M   ok    økene       ok
SFX M   ok    økenes      ok
SFX M   or    ødre        or
SFX M   or    ødrene      or
SFX M   or    ødrenes     or
SFX M   ar    edre        ar
SFX M   ar    edrene      ar
SFX M   ar    edrenes     ar
SFX M   aft   efter       aft
SFX M   aft   eftene      aft
SFX M   aft   eftenes     aft
SFX M   ot    øter        [bn]ot
SFX M   ot    øtene       [bn]ot
SFX M   ot    øtter       [fr]ot
SFX M   ot    øttene      [fr]ot
SFX M   ann   enn         ann
SFX M   ann   enns        ann
SFX M   ann   ennene      ann
SFX M   ann   ennenes     ann
SFX M   ang   enger       ang
SFX M   ang   engene      ang
SFX M   ang   engenes     ang
SFX M   er    ene         er
SFX M   er    enes        er
SFX M   å     od          å
SFX M   a     ok          ta

SFX N Y 9
SFX N   0     en          e
SFX N   0     ens         e
SFX N   0     er          e
SFX N   0     ene         e
SFX N   er    rer         [^m]er
SFX N   er    rers        [^m]er
SFX N   mer   rer         mer
SFX N   mer   rers        mer
SFX N   å     o           å

SFX O Y 9
SFX O   e     te          [^t]e
SFX O   e     t           [^t]e
SFX O   0     a           atter
SFX O   atter øtre        atter
SFX O   atter øtrer       atter
SFX O   atter øtrene      atter
SFX O   a     og          a
SFX O   0     dd          a
SFX O   0     tt          a

SFX P Y 2
SFX P   0     dde         [aeiouyøå]
SFX P   0     dd          [aeiouyøå]

SFX Q Y 2
SFX Q   e     de          e
SFX Q   e     d           e

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   e     0           [^m]e
SFX R   e     0           [^m]me
SFX R   me    0           mme
SFX R   ere   ér          ere

SFX S Y 2
SFX S   0     nde         e
SFX S   0     ende        [aiouyæøå]

SFX T Y 3
SFX T   0     t           e
SFX T   0     te          e
SFX T   0     e           et

SFX U Y 11
SFX U   t     n           et
SFX U   et    ne          [^m]et
SFX U   met   ne          met
SFX U   ele   al          ele
SFX U   ele   ålet        ele
SFX U   øre   orde        øre
SFX U   øre   ort         øre
SFX U   egge  agt         egge
SFX U   egge  agte        egge
SFX U   um    a           um
SFX U   gi    av          gi

SFX V Y 14
SFX V   0     e           [^lmneo]
SFX V   0     e           [^e][ln]
SFX V   el    le          [^m]el
SFX V   fen   ne          fen
SFX V   mel   le          mel
SFX V   en    ne          [^fkls]en
SFX V   sen   ne          ssen
SFX V   en    ne          [^s]sen
SFX V   ken   ne          kken
SFX V   en    ne          [^k]ken
SFX V   len   ne          llen
SFX V   en    ne          [^l]len
SFX V   0     me          [aeiouø]m
SFX V   0     e           [^aeiouø]m

SFX W Y 13
SFX W   0     t           [^fklntiaøå]
SFX W   0     t           [^f]f
SFX W   f     t           ff
SFX W   0     t           [^k]k
SFX W   k     t           kk
SFX W   0     t           [^l]l
SFX W   0     t           ull
SFX W   l     t           [^u]ll
SFX W   0     t           [^n]n
SFX W   n     t           nn
SFX W   0     t           ei
SFX W   0     tt          [^e]i
SFX W   0     tt          [aøå]
