hunspell/nb_NO.dic
Dubai/J
Holmefjord/J
Mjølkeråen/J
Skrovkjosen/J
ai/L
antiseptikum/BU
applikere/EJORSt
arbeidstakergruppe/ACEFG
arrestordre/AEG
askerbøring/AEGH
au/CEGJKLSVWYZt
avfyre/EJO
avhente/CEJWt
avkoke/EJS
avløys/EKVW
avtaker/dAIz
avvergene/R
balansere/EJOSYt
ballettmester/AGIN
barnehageansatt/KV
bearbeide/CEFJMQRSTY_tv
begi/JKLSW
beltedrevet/U
benyttet/aCMT
beregne/CEJMRSTYZ_tuz
beregningsregel/AEFGHz
bespotte/CEJMSTYuv
bestrø/P
besudl/CEKV
besøksgård/EG
bevre/CEFGHJMRSTYt
bile/ACEFGHJOQRSY
blåser/AIz
botnløs/VWX
bresere/EJOS
bro/CDJLPz
brum/CUV
bråkene/R
brødfø/LP
bukte/ACEGHJMRSTYy
byggeanmeld/EKV
byggeanvisning/EG
byggmester/AGHINz
bytt/BCEGHKV
børst/ACEFGHKV
bøye/ACEGHJMQRSTY`tuyz
dagleieren/V
dalte/ACEGJMST
dataføre/EJORS
delfintrener/AI
deoksidere/EJORt
dikteringsmedium/CEGU
dobbeltknappe/CMW
dokketeater/BCEFGHJz
drenere/EJORSY_t
dreng/AEGH
durksy/JLPS
dyrepark/AEGz
eftervinter/AEFGHJN
eggvend/EKVW
enkeltløpet/CMTX
erodere/EJORSYZt
erosjon/AEFGHJ\z
ervervskommunene/R
etterkommer/AIJ
etterprøve/EJMQQSWZt
evaporasjon/AEFGHJ
faderløs/V
famnedyp/VWX
feilopplysninger/M
feltnavn/BCG
filtsko/L
finger/ACEFGHJNVWz
finkam/AEFGHJ
flislegg/EKV
flymuseum/CEGU
forarge/CEJMSTYtuv
forblø/JLPSYt
fordelingsmøte/rBCEGH
forebygge/EJS_tv
forlagsbokhandler/AI
formasjon/AEFGHJz
formtre/KL
forskjønne/CEJMSTYv
forskreve/CEJMQRST
forskriftsfeste/CJMWt
forstu/ACEGKSVYt
forstøving/CEG
forvåkt/VX
fosforisere/EJOSY
franarre/CEJMST
fransiskanerordenene/R
fri/EJLPSVWXYtwz
frå/N
furer/AL
gasse/ACEGHJMRSTYt
gebyrlegge/EJSUY
gitteravstandsparameter/AEGI
gjenerobre/CEJMSWYt
gjøde/EJQSYy
gladlynne/CEGW
gladmenneske/BEFGH
gnusle/CEJMST
gny/BCGJLPSYtz
golfsko/L
gondoliere/ACEFGHJ
grimet/CMTUX
grøtet/TUX
gulmoden/VWX
hams/ACEGHKV
handsleggene/R
havrettsminister/AGIN
heimsted/BEGH
henvende/EJOSYtv
hilse/AEJORSWY`tyz
hilsningsord/CG
hjerter/AIJMz
hotellportier/AL
hovedutstilling/ACEFGHJ
hylle/ACEGHJMRSTYtz
håndklappe/CEJSY
håndmate/CEJMSTY
ide/CEGHNRWtu
identitetsløs/V
ihukommet/U
innbyggingene/R
innleie/EJQYt
innlemme/CEJWtvz
innrei/EKPSVY
insubordinasjon/AEFGHJ
japaner/AIJK
jubileumsnummer/BEFGH
jubilé/BCEGH
juletre/KLz
justere/EJORSYZ_tz
juvelen/JK
kame/NR
kediv/EG
kitte/BCEGJMSTYt
kjaven/VW
kjedeformet/CMTX
kjærkommen/W
kjøttbuljongene/R
klarlegge/EJUt
klatre/CEJMRSTYtz
konkurranseskytter/AI
kontrollsjef/AEFGHJz
kramse/CEJMSTt
kryssbruke/EJOSY
kryssforhør/BCEVW
kuldslå/JKLNSW
kultursenter/BCEFGHJz
kurse/ABCEGHJMRSTYt
kuve/CEGJMQRT
kuwaiter/AIK
kvi/CEJKLPSVWYt
kvilelausest/V
kåpelommene/R
lagasilden/JK
lavpristilbud/BG
leite/CEGJMSTYtz
lengdemåler/AI
levendegjøre/JRSUtv
likne/CEJMRSTY_tvz
liturgikommisjon/AEFGHJ
lyde/AEFGHJOQQRSYu
lå/JLNW
malermester/AGHIN
maske/ACEGHJMMRSTTY^z
matvareeksportene/R
meinløs/VWX
metallarbeider/AIJz
mosjonere/EJORSYt
motehus/BCGH
muer/CEFGHN
musikkforum/BCU
mygl/CEGKV
nabohave/AEG
naturaliser/VW
never/ACEGMNz
noten/aJ
nu/CEGPPW
nyorientere/EJORSt
nærme/CEJMSTY
nødhjelperen/V
nødverjene/R
omskrive/EIJSYty
oppheve/CEJMQRSTYtuv
oppstå/LMSWvz
pakte/ACEGHJMRST
parallellimportere/EO
pensjon/AEFGHJ\]
personliggjøre/JRSU
poset/CMTUX
prestasjonsavhengig/V
produksjonsbedrift/AEG
produktkvalitetene/R
profesjon/AEFGHJ\z
profittere/EJORSYt
prosentlikn/EK
prøvefly/JLPSY
pueril/VWX
påstå/JKLMNSWYZ
regidebutere/EO
registrere/EJORSYZ_tz
regresjon/AEFGHJ
rågummisko/L
rødhåret/CMT
røret/CJTUX
sage/ACDEFGHJMOOQRSTYt
sakkyndigst/V
saksøker/AIJ
saueskrottene/R
seipe/CEJMRST
si/CEGJKLPSWY
sidespark/BCG
siktet/aCMT
sitronmarinere/EJOSY
sjakkmønster/BCEGH
skad/ACEGHKVZ
skolemøte/CEGW
skrivebok/ACDM
skyggest/V
slagordenene/R
slottsfjellet/J
slu/JLPVWXYw
slumsøster/AEFGHN
smøremiddel/BCEFGH
snekkerere/EJOSY
spermium/CEGU
spidde/BCEGHJMSTYt
spå/JLPSYz
stabsoffiser/AL
stallmester/AEGI
stamme/ACEFGHJMRSTY[z
statoilansatt/KV
steinkjerke/CEG
stormaskinprodukt/BEGH
streve/BCEGJMQRSTY
stymperen/JV
subvensjonere/EJOSY
sumpgassene/R
sæte/EJSY
taus/CEGHVWXw
te/CDEFJKNPPTYt
tikke/CEGJMRSTYt
tilby/JLPSY
tilintetgjøre/JRSUv
tjuvtitt/CEKV
tobakksskade/AEGHQW
tommelfingerregel/AEFGH
tove/CEGJMRSTYt
triasperiode/EG
trø/ACEGHJLPSVWY
tyrann/AEFGH
tyster/AI
uantastet/CMTX
underminere/EJORt
undertegne/CEJMRSTYtv
unndra/JLOPW
unnveket/U
utmeisl/CEKV
uttyde/CEJMQRSTY
utvaske/CEJMSTYtu
vanndannelsene/R
vannsalamander/AGIN
veiken/KV
vektløs/VWw
vill-lei/EKPSV
vit/CJKVx
voksavstøyping/CEG
ødsle/CEJMSTYt
øye/BCDEFGHIJQQRSYyz
